Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Article 19. Stopping, Standing and Parking.

§ 63-3-901.
Stopping, standing or parking prohibited in specified places.

No person shall stop, stand or park a vehicle, except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or in compliance with the directions of a police officer or traffic control device, in any of the following places:

a. On a sidewalk;

b. In front of a public or private driveway;

c. Within an intersection;

d. Within ten feet of a fire hydrant;

e. On a crosswalk;

f. Within twenty feet of a crosswalk at an intersection;

g. Within thirty feet upon the approach to any flashing beacon, stop sign, or traffic-control signal located at the side of a roadway;

h. Between a safety zone and the adjacent curb or within thirty feet of points on the curb immediately opposite the ends of a safety zone, unless the traffic authority indicates a different length by signs or markings;

i. Within fifteen feet of the nearest rail of a railroad crossing;

j. Within twenty feet of the driveway entrance to any fire station and on the side of a street opposite the entrance of any fire station within seventy-five feet of said entrance when properly signposted;

k. Alongside or opposite any street excavation or obstruction when such stopping, standing, or parking would obstruct traffic;

m. Upon any bridge or other elevated structure upon a highway or within a highway tunnel;

n. At any place where official signs prohibit stopping.

No person shall move a vehicle not owned by such person into any such prohibited area or away from a curb such distance as is unlawful.

On the roadway side of any vehicle stopped or parked at the edge or curb of a street;

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8217; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-903.
Stopping, standing or parking upon highway outside of business or residence districts.

No person shall stop, park or leave standing any vehicle, whether attended or unattended, upon the paved or improved or main traveled part of any highway outside of a business or residence district when it is practical to stop, park or so leave such vehicle off such part of said highway. In every event, however, a clear and unobstructed width of at least twenty (20) feet of such part of the highway opposite such standing vehicle shall be left for the free passage of other vehicles and a clear view of such stopped vehicle be available from a distance of two hundred (200) feet in each direction upon such highway.

This section shall not apply to the driver of any vehicle which is disabled while on the paved or improved or main traveled portion of a highway in such manner and to such extent that it is impossible to avoid stopping and temporarily leaving such disabled vehicle in such position.

Any vehicle used solely for the purpose of collecting solid waste, under a contract with any county, municipality, resident or business for the collection of solid waste may stop or stand on the road, street or highway for the sole purpose of collecting solid waste. Such solid waste collection vehicle shall maintain hazard lights on the vehicle at all times that it is engaged in stopping or standing for the purpose of solid waste collection.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8215; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1992, ch. 583 § 16, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).

§ 63-3-905.
Authority of police officers to remove or provide for removal of illegally stopped vehicles.

Whenever any police officer finds a vehicle standing upon a highway in violation of Section 63-3-903, such officer is hereby authorized to move such vehicle, or require the driver or other person in charge of the vehicle to move the same, to a position off the paved or improved or main traveled part of such highway.

Whenever any police officer finds a vehicle unattended upon any bridge or causeway or in any tunnel where such vehicle constitutes an obstruction to traffic, such officer is hereby authorized to provide for the removal of such vehicle to the nearest garage or other place of safety.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8216; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-907.
Parking parallel with right-hand curb.

Except where angle parking is permitted by local ordinance or usage, every vehicle stopped or parked upon a roadway where there is an adjacent curb shall be stopped or parked with the right-hand wheels of such vehicle parallel with and within twelve inches of the right-hand curb.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8218; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-909.
Parking of unattended motor vehicles.

No person driving or in charge of a motor vehicle shall permit it to stand unattended without first stopping the engine, locking the ignition and removing the key, and, when standing upon any perceptible grade, without effectively setting the brake thereon and turning the front wheels to the curb or side of the highway.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8219; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-911.
Opening door of stopped motor vehicle.

No person shall open any door on a motor vehicle unless and until it is reasonably safe to do so and can be done without interfering with the movement of other traffic, nor shall any person leave a door open on a side of a vehicle available to moving traffic for a period of time longer than necessary to load or unload passengers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 350, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 63-3-913.
Designation of areas of private property as restricted for emergency vehicle access; parking in or blocking restricted access areas.

The designation of areas on private property which are clearly marked to restrict access thereto to emergency vehicles shall be considered permission by the owner of such property that law enforcement officers may enter such private property to enforce such restricted access; and all municipal, county and state law enforcement officers are authorized to enforce such restriction.

It is unlawful to park a motor vehicle, other than an emergency vehicle responding to an emergency, in an area which has been marked as provided in subsection (1) of this section; and any person who unlawfully parks a motor vehicle in such an area or who blocks access thereto is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for each violation. For the third and any subsequent offense under this section, the offender’s driver’s license shall be suspended for ninety (90) days in accordance with Section 63-1-53, Mississippi Code of 1972, in addition to any fine imposed.

For the purpose of this section “emergency vehicle” means fire department vehicles, law enforcement vehicles, ambulances and any other vehicle designated as an emergency vehicle by the governing authority of the county or municipality within which the private property is located.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 461, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 63-3-915.
Who may authorize towing of vehicle located on private property.

A motor vehicle that is located upon private property may not be towed except when authorized by the owner of the motor vehicle, the lienholder of the motor vehicle, the owner of the property upon which the motor vehicle is located or the towing is authorized by other local, state or federal law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 451, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.